lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Žemės ūkis > Gyvulininkystė > Gyvulių šėryklos ir girdyklos: Gyvulių šėryklos; Gyvulių girdyklos
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Agricultura > Criação de animais > Comedouros e bebedouros para pecuária: Comedouros para pecuária; Bebedouros para pecuária
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Селско стопанство > Животновъдство > Хранилки и поилки за добитък: Хранилки за добитък; Поилки за добитък
da: Erhverv og industri > Landbrug > Husdyrbrug > Fodertrug og vandsystemer til kreaturer: Fodertrug til kreaturer; Vandsystemer til kreaturer
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Maatalous > Karjatalous > Tuotantoeläinten ruoka- ja vesiastiat: Tuotantoeläinten ruoka-astiat; Tuotantoeläinten vesiastiat
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Poľnohospodárstvo > Chov zvierat > Kŕmidlá a napájadlá pre hospodárske zvieratá: Kŕmidlá pre hospodárske zvieratá; Napájadlá pre hospodárske zvieratá
nb: Forretninger og industri > Jordbruk > Husdyrhold > Fôrere og vannbeholdere for husdyr: Husdyrfôrere; Husdyrvannere
sv: Företag och industri > Jordbruk > Boskapsskötsel > Mat- och vattensystem för boskap: Boskapsutfodrare; Boskapsvattnare
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Сельское хозяйство > Животноводство > Кормушки и поилки для скота: Кормушки для скота; Поилки для скота
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Agriculture > Élevage > Mangeoires et abreuvoirs pour bétail: Mangeoires pour bétail; Abreuvoirs pour bétail
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Agricultura > Pecuária > Comedouros para gado: Comedouros de gado; Bebedouros para gado
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Γεωργία > Κτηνοτροφία > Ταΐστρες και ποτίστρες ζώων εκτροφής: Ταΐστρες ζώων εκτροφής; Ποτίστρες ζώων εκτροφής
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Tarım > Hayvancılık > Çiftlik Hayvanı Yemlikleri ve Sulukları: Hayvan Yemlikleri; Hayvan Sulukları
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Landwirtschaft > Viehhaltung > Viehfutterspender & -tränken: Viehfutterspender; Viehtränken
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Kmetijstvo > Živinoreja > Krmilniki in napajalniki za živino: Krmilniki za živino; Napajalniki za živino
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Mezőgazdaság > Állattenyésztés > Haszonállat-etetők és -itatók: Haszonállat-etetők; Haszonállat-itatók
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > เกษตรกรรม > การเลี้ยงสัตว์ > เครื่องให้อาหารและน้ำในปศุสัตว์: เครื่องให้อาหารปศุสัตว์; เครื่องให้น้ำในปศุสัตว์
en: Business & Industrial > Agriculture > Animal Husbandry > Livestock Feeders & Waterers: Livestock Feeders; Livestock Waterers
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 農業 > 畜牧業 > 牲畜餵食器/給水器: 牲畜餵食器; 牲畜給水器
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 农/畜牧/渔业专用设备 > 畜牧业 > 畜牧业喂食器/饮水器: 畜牧业喂食器; 畜牧业饮水器
it: Commercio e industria > Agricoltura > Zootecnia > Mangiatoie e abbeveratoi per bestiame: Alimentatori di bestiame; Abbeveratoi per bestiame
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Poljoprivreda > Stočarstvo > Hranilice i pojilice za stoku: Hranilice za stoku; Pojilice za stoku
es: Economía e industria > Agricultura > Cría de animales > Comederos y bebederos de ganado: Comederos para ganado; Bebederos para ganado
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Agricultură > Creșterea animalelor > Dispozitive de hrănire și adăpători pentru animale: Dispozitive de hrănire pentru animale; Adăpători pentru animale
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 農業 > 畜産 > 家畜用餌箱: 家畜用飼料箱; 家畜用給水箱
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 농업 > 축산업 > 사료 공급기/급수기: 가축 사료 공급기; 가축 급수기
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Nông nghiệp > Chăn nuôi > Dụng cụ cho ăn và cấp nước cho vật nuôi: Máy cho gia súc ăn; Máy cho gia súc uống nước
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Agrarische sector > Veeteelt > Veevoederbakken: Standaard veevoederbakken; Veedrinkbakken
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zemědělství > Zootechnika > Krmítka pro hospodářská zvířata: Krmítka pro dobytek; Napáječky pro dobytek
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Rolnictwo > Hodowla zwierząt > Karmniki dla zwierząt hodowlanych: Karmniki dla zwierząt gospodarskich; Poidła dla bydła